Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.1 Work Training Program

40-6.1-1.
Work training program.

There is hereby created a work training program to augment the general public assistance program created pursuant to §

40-6-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1.

40-6.1-2.
Participation requirement — Assignment of work.

As provided in this chapter, employable persons receiving financial support from the state shall be required to participate in the work training program and to perform such work as may be assigned to them by the director of the department of human services (hereinafter called the “director”), or his or her designee. The director shall assign such work as is available in connection with the affairs of the state, and all of the several cities and towns participating in the general public assistance program (GPA) shall be required to provide work-training opportunities for residents of their respective cities and towns who receive GPA support. The director shall determine if the work is suitable and whether the GPA recipient is able to perform the work. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the recipients shall not be utilized in any work position to replace or perform work ordinarily performed by regular employees of any department or agency of state or municipal government, nor to replace or perform work ordinarily performed by a craft or trade person in private employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 128; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 28.

40-6.1-3.
Work hours.

No recipient shall be required to work in excess of eight (8) hours per day, nor in excess of forty (40) hours per week. The actual number of work-training hours required shall be determined by dividing the total grant of the recipient received under the general public assistance program (GPA), by the then-prevailing minimum wage. The grant of each recipient shall then be increased by the amount of thirty dollars ($30.00) per week, or a portion thereof proportionate to the number of hours actually worked compared to a standard forty-hour (40) week. The increase shall be considered to result from the recipient’s participation in the program, and shall be included in determining the number of hours to be worked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1.

40-6.1-4.
Ineligibility of nonparticipants for support.

Should any recipient fail, without good cause, to participate in the work training program, the recipient shall be determined to be ineligible for support under the general public assistance program (GPA). In case the recipient is a parent of minor children, then that portion of his or her grant attributable to the parent shall be removed from the grant, and the director shall take whatever action he or she deems appropriate under the nonsupport provisions of chapter 9 of title 15.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1.

40-6.1-5.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to determine the employability of the general public assistance program (GPA) recipients, the conditions for employment under the work training program, and other regulations needed to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1.

40-6.1-6.
Additional expenditures and manpower requirements.

Any additional expenditures or manpower required to administer the work training program shall be borne within the existing budget of the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 4, § 1.

40-6.1-7.
Severability.

If any provision in any article of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, its invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 8, § 1.